Utah statutes.
58-17b-608.1.   Refills of legend drug prescriptions.

If a prescription for a legend drug includes authorization for one or more refills, a pharmacist or pharmacy intern may dispense one or more of the refills at the time the drug is dispensed, if:

(1)  the drug is not a controlled substance;

(2)  the prescription does not include "Dispense quantity written," or some other notation having similar meaning;

(3)  the total dosage units dispensed, including the units for both the prescription and any refills, do not exceed a 100-day supply; and

(4)  in the professional judgment of the pharmacist or pharmacy intern the refill, or refills, should be dispensed at the time the prescription is dispensed.



Enacted by Chapter 166, 2013 General Session

